algorithms/ukrainian.sbl
    define verb as (
        [substring] among (
            // Longest endings first
            '{a}{t}{y}' '{i}{t}{y}'         // Infinitive (читати→чит, робити→роб)
            '{y}{t}{y}'                     // Infinitive (робити with и)
            '{a}{v}' '{i}{v}'               // Past masc (читав→чит, робів→роб)
            '{y}{v}'                        // Past masc (робив→роб)
            '{a}{iu}' '{i}{iu}'             // Present 1st sg
            '{iu}{t}{'}'  '{u}{t}{'}'       // Present 3rd pl
            '{a}{iu}{t}{'}'                 // Present 3rd pl variant
            '{ie}{m}{o}' '{i}{m}{o}'        // Present 1st pl
            '{y}{m}{o}'                     // Present 1st pl (робимо)
            '{ie}{t}{e}' '{i}{t}{e}'        // Present 2nd pl
            '{y}{t}{e}'                     // Present 2nd pl (робите)
            '{i`}{t}{e}'                    // Imperative pl variant
            '{ie}{m}' '{i}{m}'              // Present 1st pl short
            '{y}{m}'                        // Present 1st pl short (робим)
            '{l}{a}' '{l}{y}' '{l}{o}'      // Past tense (others)
            '{t}{y}'                        // Infinitive (fallback)
            '{ie}{sh}' '{y}{sh}'            // Present 2nd sg
            '{ie}'                          // Present 3rd sg/future
            '{i`}'                          // Imperative sg
            '{iu}' '{u}'                    // Present 1st sg (fallback)
            '{v}'                           // Past masc (fallback)
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define noun as (
        [substring] among (
            // Collective/abstract nouns (specific, safe without R2)
            '{s}{t}{v}{o}'            // -ство (багатство→багат)
            '{t}{v}{o}'              // -тво (words in -цтво like козацтво match -ство above)

            // Longest plural endings first
            '{ia}{m}{y}' '{a}{m}{y}'        // Instrumental plural
            '{ia}{kh}' '{a}{kh}'            // Locative plural
            '{ia}{m}' '{a}{m}'              // Dative plural
            '{i}{v}' '{e}{v}' '{e}{i`}'     // Genitive plural masc

            // Singular specific endings
            '{o}{v}{i}'                      // -ові (братові→брат)
            '{e}{v}{i}'
            // Instrumental singular
            '{ie}{m}' '{e}{m}' '{o}{m}'
            '{ie}{iu}' '{e}{iu}' '{o}{iu}'

            // Shorter endings
            '{ia}' '{a}' '{u}' '{iu}' '{i}' '{yi}' '{y}' '{e}' '{ie}' '{o}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define professional as (
        [substring] among (
            '{i}{v}{n}{y}{k}'  '{a}{l}{'}{n}{y}{k}'  '{e}{l}{'}{n}{y}{k}'  // -івник, -альник, -ельник
            '{ia}{r}' '{a}{r}'  // -яр, -ар (каменяр)
            '{n}{y}{k}'         // -ник (generic agent)
            '{a}{ch}'           // -ач (копач)
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define diminutive as (
        [substring] among (
            // Double diminutives (longest first)
            '{o}{ch}{e}{ch}{o}{k}' '{o}{ch}{e}{ch}{k}{a}' '{o}{ch}{e}{ch}{k}{y}' '{o}{ch}{e}{ch}{k}{o}' '{o}{ch}{e}{ch}{k}{i}'

            // Animal young (from dictionary analysis)
            '{i}{t}{k}{o}'         // -ітко (собаченітко → собачен)
            '{ia}{t}{k}{o}'        // -ятко (солов'ятко → солов, соколенятко → соколен)
            '{a}{t}{k}{o}'         // -атко (babies)

            // Most diminutive forms
            '{o}{ch}{o}{k}' '{o}{ch}{k}{a}' '{o}{ch}{k}{y}' '{o}{ch}{k}{o}' '{o}{ch}{k}{i}'
            '{e}{ch}{o}{k}' '{e}{ch}{k}{a}' '{e}{ch}{k}{y}' '{e}{ch}{k}{o}' '{e}{ch}{k}{i}'
            '{i}{ch}{o}{k}' '{i}{ch}{k}{a}' '{i}{ch}{k}{y}' '{i}{ch}{k}{o}' '{i}{ch}{k}{i}'

            // Intensive diminutives (longest first)
            '{e}{s}{e}{n}{'}{k}{a}' '{e}{s}{e}{n}{'}{k}{y}' '{e}{s}{e}{n}{'}{k}{o}' '{e}{s}{e}{n}{'}{k}{i}'  // -есеньк-
            '{i}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{a}' '{i}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{y}' '{i}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{o}' '{i}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{i}'  // -ісіньк-
            '{iu}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{a}' '{iu}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{y}' '{iu}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{o}' '{iu}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}{i}'  // -юсіньк-
            '{o}{n}{'}{k}{a}' '{o}{n}{'}{k}{y}' '{o}{n}{'}{k}{o}' '{o}{n}{'}{k}{i}'  // -оньк-

            // Regular -еньк-, -іньк- patterns
            '{e}{n}{'}{k}{u}'
            '{e}{n}{'}{k}{a}' '{e}{n}{'}{k}{y}' '{e}{n}{'}{k}{o}' '{e}{n}{'}{k}{i}'
            '{i}{n}{'}{k}{a}' '{i}{n}{'}{k}{y}' '{i}{n}{'}{k}{o}' '{i}{n}{'}{k}{i}'

            // Animal young (shorter forms)
            '{e}{n}{ia}'  // -еня (козеня, лисеня)

            // Short diminutives (3+ chars to avoid conflicts with regular nouns)
            '{ch}{y}{k}'          // -чик (хлопчик)
            '{y}{n}{k}{a}' '{i}{n}{k}{a}'  // -инка/-інка (дівчинка)
            '{u}{s}{'}'  '{i}{s}{'}'  '{o}{s}{'}'
            '{u}{n}{'}'  '{i}{n}{'}'  '{e}{n}{'}'
            // 2-char: -ик/-ік/-ок safe (few non-diminutive nouns end with these)
            // NOT -ка/-ко (too common as regular noun endings)
            '{y}{k}' '{i}{k}' '{o}{k}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define diminutive_stem as (
        [substring] among (
            '{e}{s}{e}{n}{'}{k}'  // -есеньк
            '{i}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}'  // -ісіньк
            '{iu}{s}{i}{n}{'}{k}' // -юсіньк
            '{o}{ch}{e}{ch}'      // -очеч
            '{e}{n}{'}{k}'        // -еньк
            '{o}{n}{'}{k}'        // -оньк
            '{i}{n}{'}{k}'        // -іньк
            // -ятк intentionally excluded: occurs in stems like
            // десятк(а), пам'ятк(а); -ятко handled in diminutive above
            '{i}{t}{k}'           // -ітк
            '{a}{t}{k}'           // -атк
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define verbal_noun as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            // Verbal nouns — R2 required to protect short words like
            // мигтіння, боління, бродіння from over-stemming
            '{a}{n}{n}{ia}'        // -ання
            '{ia}{n}{n}{ia}'       // -яння
            '{i}{n}{n}{ia}'        // -іння
            '{e}{n}{n}{ia}'        // -ення
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define derivational as (
        [substring] R2 among (
            // Derivational suffixes (only in R2 region!)
            '{i}{z}{a}{ts}{i}{ia}'  // -ізація
            '{a}{ts}{i}{ia}'        // -ація
            '{i}{v}{shch}{y}{n}{a}' // -івщина (бабівщина → баб)

            // Place/female forms
            '{a}{r}{n}{ia}'       // -арня
            '{i}{v}{n}{ia}'       // -івня
            '{n}{y}{ts}{ia}'      // -ниця

            // Collective/abstract
            '{ts}{t}{v}{o}'       // -цтво
            '{s}{t}{v}{o}'        // -ство

            // Quality/abstract
            '{n}{i}{s}{t}{'}'     // -ність
            '{o}{v}{i}{s}{t}{'}'  // -овість
            '{i}{s}{t}{'}'        // -ість

            // Adjectival derivational
            '{e}{l}{'}{n}'        // -ельн (кахельний → кахел after adj -ий)
            '{l}{'}{n}'           // -льн (кахльний → кахл)
            '{s}{'}{k}'           // -ськ (козацький → козац)
            '{z}{'}{k}'           // -зьк
            '{u}{v}{a}{t}'        // -уват
            '{o}{v}{a}{t}'        // -оват
            '{i}{v}{n}'           // -івн (пасічниківна → пасічник)
            '{o}{v}'              // -ов (дощовий → дощ after adj -ий)
            '{ia}{n}'             // -ян (кахляний → кахл after adj -ий)

            // Other
            '{i}{z}{m}'           // -ізм
            '{i}{s}{t}'           // -іст
            '{y}{shch}'           // -ищ
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define tidy_up as (
        [substring] among (
            // Superlative/comparative forms
            '{i}{sh}'
               (delete
                ['{n}'] '{n}' delete
               )
            // Consonant alternations in verbs
            '{l}'
               ('{b}' or '{p}' or '{v}' or '{m}' delete)
            // Double consonants
            '{n}'
               ('{n}' delete)
            // Soft sign cleanup
            '{'}'
               (delete)
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    // Strip най- prefix (superlative)
    do (
        ['{n}{a}{i`}'] delete
    )
    unset found_diminutive
    unset found_professional
    do mark_regions
    backwards setlimit tomark pV for (
        do (
             perfective_gerund or
             ( try reflexive
               ( verbal_noun or
                 ( try ( ( professional (set found_professional) )
                         or ( diminutive (set found_diminutive) ) )
                   not found_professional ( adjective or verb or noun )
                 )
               )
             )
        )
        // Diminutive stems (after adjective endings removed)
        try ( diminutive_stem (set found_diminutive) )

        // Professional suffixes (after noun declension removed)
        // Skip if diminutive already fired (prevents -ач removal on собач- from собаченітко)
        not found_diminutive not found_professional try professional

        // Derivational suffixes (in R2 only)
        do derivational
        do tidy_up
    )
)
